Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.050

Deputy director—Department personnel director—Assistant directors.

The director shall appoint a deputy director, a department personnel director, and assistant directors as needed to administer the department. The deputy director is responsible for the general supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

[ 2005 c 333 s 5.]